Hawaii, session 2025, HB1206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii offers a unique opportunity for job growth and economic development through its important geographic location.  In fiscal year 2022, Hawaii received almost $9,000,000,000 in defense spending.  Furthermore, the number of defense-related jobs increased by about ten thousand jobs from fiscal year 2018 to fiscal year 2022. Many of these jobs are in the areas of information technology, cybersecurity, intelligence, and data science fields and provide good-paying jobs for Hawaii's local economy. The purpose of this Act is to build a local workforce to meet the growing demand for jobs in the areas of information technology, cybersecurity, intelligence, and data science fields by utilizing the expertise at two university campuses, the university of Hawaii at Mānoa's college of social sciences and the university of Hawaii, West Oahu's business administration department, focused on producing the workforce for the defense sector in these related fields. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $425,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for: (1)  Two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) assistant professors in international economics, trade, and security; (2)  One full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) professor of practice in intelligence studies; (3)  One full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) educational specialist; and (4)  One part-time equivalent (0.5 FTE) graduate research assistant, to be located at the university of Hawaii at Mānoa college of social sciences to develop a workforce to support the defense sector of the State's economy. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $75,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for student housing, travel costs, materials supplies, and operation of the academy for Hawaii intelligence studies summer program of the university of Hawaii at Mānoa college of social sciences to develop a talent pipeline of students to support the defense sector of the State's economy. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $130,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for: (1)  One part-time equivalent (0.5 FTE) faculty for the directory of the cybersecurity coordinator center; and (2)  One part-time equivalent (0.5 FTE) faculty for the director of the cybersecurity research laboratory, to be located at the university of Hawaii, West Oahu's department of business administration to develop a workforce to support the defense sector of the State's economy. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $270,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for student internship programs, certifications, software, and other expenses related to the program located at the university of Hawaii, West Oahu's department of business administration to develop a workforce to support the defense sector of the State's economy.. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________